Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1, chapter 596, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by  section 1, chapter 104,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2023-2025 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Chemeketa Community
College, Building 7 Remodel ........ $ 8,110,000
(b) Klamath Community College,
Childcare Resource Learning
[Center ...............................................$ 1,535,000]
Center..................................... $ 4,050,000
(c) Rogue Community College,
Transportation Technology
Centers..............................................$ 7,105,000
(d) Central Oregon Community
College, Renovation and
Expansion of CTE Facilities
at Redmond Campus ...................... $ 4,050,000
(e) Clatsop Community College,
Maritime Science Building ........... $ 8,010,000
(f) Oregon Coast Community
College, Center for Trades
Education .........................................$ 8,110,000
(g) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Campus Renovations
for Student Safety and
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 1
Success ..............................................$ 5,595,000
(h) Lane Community College,
Science, Mathematics and
Engineering Building
Renovation .......................................$ 8,110,000
(i) Portland Community College,
Rock Creek Campus Building
Complex - Phase I .......................... $ 8,110,000
(j) Southwestern Oregon
Community College,
Student Uplift and
Collaboration Create Expanded
Support and Success ...................... $ 8,110,000
(k) Umpqua Community College,
Welcome Center and Medical
Careers Training Hub ................... $ 8,110,000
(L) University of Oregon,
Friendly Hall Renovation ............. $ 7,650,000
(m) Oregon State University,
Collaborative Innovation
Complex ............................................$ 72,680,000
(n) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design
Project Completions ....................... $ 4,330,000
(2) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ......................... $ 10,333,333
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) ................ $ 100,885,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ................. $ 50,570,000
(5) Department of Education
(Art. XI-P) ........................................$ 100,885,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q):
(a) Oregon Military Department:
(A) Salem Owen Summers Building
Service Life Extension .................. $ 2,955,000
(B) Salem Owen Summers Building
Seismic Strengthening and
Life Safety Improvements ............. $ 5,595,000
(b) Department of State Police:
(A) Central Point Office
Expansion .........................................$ 26,845,000
(B) Springfield Forensic Lab and
Medical Examiner’s Office ........... $ 21,545,000
(C) Springfield Patrol Area
Command Office .............................. $ 7,385,000
(c) Department of Corrections:
(A) Camera System ............................... $ 8,615,000
(B) Capital Improvement and
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 2
Renewal ............................................$ 50,570,000
(C) Wireless Communication
System...............................................$ 13,070,000
(d) Oregon Youth Authority:
(A) Camp Riverbend Dorm
Renovation .......................................$ 9,005,000
(B) Capital Improvements -
All Facilities ....................................$ 11,795,000
(C) Control Room Renovations .......... $ 330,000
(D) JJIS IT System
Modernization ................................. $ 7,850,000
(E) MacLaren West Cottages
Renovations .....................................$ 11,425,000
(F) Rogue Valley Facility
Improvements .................................. $ 1,509,910
(G) Tillamook Dorm Renovation ........ $ 12,070,000
(H) Tillamook Medical and
Dental Renovations ........................ $ 830,000
(I) Oak Creek Youth
Correctional Facility ..................... $ 4,050,000
(e) Department of Education,
Oregon School for the Deaf
Capital Improvements ................... $ 3,550,000
(f) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................... $ 2,461,687
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II ............................................$ 1,134,135
(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft .................. $ 4,720,020
(D) Salem Airport Hangar ................... $ 791,520
(g) State Department of Fish
and Wildlife, Capital
Improvement and Renewal ........... $ 2,540,000
(h) Housing and Community
Services Department, Local
Innovation and Fast Track
(LIFT)/Permanent Supportive
Housing Programs .......................... $ 604,280,000
(i) Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
(A) Public Universities Capital
Improvement and Renewal ........... $ 100,885,000
(B) FAMIS System Replacement,
Phase II ............................................$ 5,095,000
(C) University of Oregon,
Friendly Hall Renovation ............. $ 65,840,000
(D) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design
Project Completions ....................... $ 53,175,000
(E) Oregon Institute of
Technology, Geothermal
System Emergency
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 3
Renovation .......................................$ 18,160,000
(F) Southern Oregon University,
Central Hall Capital
Improvements (Phase II) ............... $ 6,100,000
(j) Oregon Health Authority:
(A) Junction City Single
Unit Remodel .................................. $ 5,095,000
(B) PLC System Replacement ............. $ 3,045,000
(k) Department of Revenue,
Electronic Valuation
Information System ........................ $ 14,265,000
(L) Legislative Administration
Committee, Capitol
Accessibility, Maintenance
and Safety Phase III ...................... $ 216,920,000
(m) Judicial Department:
(A) Benton County Courthouse .......... $ 15,925,000
(B) Clackamas County
Courthouse .......................................$ 45,535,000
(C) Morrow County Courthouse ........ $ 12,745,000
(D) Curry County Courthouse ............ $ 10,760,000
(n) Oregon Department of
Emergency Management,
Resiliency Grant Fund
established under
ORS 401.552.....................................$ 5,095,000
(7) Department of
Transportation (Art. XI,
section 7), Interstate 5
Bridge Replacement Project ........ $ 251,825,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(8) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) .......................... $ 109,023,670
(9) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University,
Smith Memorial Union .................. $ 8,315,000
(b) Portland State University,
Vernier Science Center and
Gateway Art and Design
Project Completions ....................... $ 18,205,000
(10) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ......................... $ 20,000,000
(11) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) .....................................$ 50,000,000
(12) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services
(Art. XI-Q):
(a) Yellow Parking Lot Paving ......... $ 4,050,000
(b) State Forestry Department:
(A) Capital Improvements ................... $ 2,418,313
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 4
(B) Toledo Facility Replacement,
Phase II ............................................$ 1,575,865
(C) Multi-Mission Aircraft .................. $ 7,444,980
(D) Salem Airport Hangar ................... $ 1,248,480
(c) Department of Justice,
Legal Tools Replacement
System 3.0 ........................................$ 21,520,000
(d) Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
(A) Liquor Warehouse Conveyor
System...............................................$ 24,305,000
(B) Liquor Warehouse Land
and Building ....................................$ 46,395,000
(C) Liquor Warehouse
Management IT System ................ $ 16,695,000
Total General Obligation
[Bonds ...............................................$2,398,871,913]
Bonds...................................... $2,401,386,913
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5050 (HB 5050-A) Page 5